Washington statutes.
RCW 18.108.060

Applicant—License or certificate holder—Compliance with procedures, requirements, fees.

Each applicant and license or certificate holder shall comply with administrative procedures, administrative requirements, and fees set by the secretary under RCW 43.70.250 and 43.70.280.

[ 2012 c 137 s 9; 1996 c 191 s 81; 1991 c 3 s 256; 1987 c 443 s 6; 1985 c 7 s 79; 1975 1st ex.s. c 280 s 6.]

NOTES:

Finding—Purpose—Rules—Effective date—2012 c 137: See notes following RCW 18.108.005.